District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.73

DC Streetcar Fund establishment.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the DC Streetcar Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Department in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of revenue from the following sources:

(1)

Revenue collected pursuant to §§ 50-921.72 and 50-921.74 by the District or its agents;

(2)

Revenue collected from DC Streetcar financing districts to be established; and

(3)

Monetary gifts and grants intended to be used to fund the DC Streetcar.

(c)

The Fund shall be used to pay for goods, services, property, or for any other authorized purpose for the administration of the DC Streetcar.

(d)

All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11o
as added Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-268, § 3, 60 DCR 1709
This section is referenced in § 50-921.71.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-268 added this section.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268 provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2015.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, §§ 6162 and 6163, provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2016.